Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-29,104
Activities not constituting transacting business.

(1) Activities of a foreign limited cooperative association which do not constitute transacting business in this state within the meaning of this section include:

(a) Maintaining, defending, and settling an action or proceeding;

(b) Holding meetings of its members or carrying on any other activity concerning its internal affairs;

(c) Maintaining accounts in financial institutions;

(d) Maintaining offices or agencies for the transfer, exchange, and registration of the foreign limited cooperative association's own securities or maintaining trustees or depositories with respect to those securities;

(e) Selling through independent contractors;

(f) Soliciting or obtaining orders, whether by mail or electronic means or through employees or agents or otherwise, if the orders require acceptance outside this state before they become contracts;

(g) Creating or acquiring indebtedness, mortgages, or security interests in real or personal property;

(h) Securing or collecting debts or enforcing mortgages or other security interests in property securing the debts and holding, protecting, and maintaining property so acquired;

(i) Conducting an isolated transaction that is completed within thirty days and is not one in the course of similar transactions of a like manner; and

(j) Transacting business in interstate commerce.

(2) For purposes of this section, the ownership in this state of income-producing real property or tangible personal property, other than property excluded under subsection (1) of this section, constitutes transacting business in this state.

(3) This section does not apply in determining the contacts or activities that may subject a foreign limited cooperative association to service of process, taxation, or regulation under any other law of this state.

Laws 2007, LB368, § 104.